District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

15-387

Applicability.

Repealed.

Feb. 10, 1996, D.C. Law 11-84, § 2, 42 DCR 6787
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 100, 51 DCR 881
Feb. 24, 2012, D.C. Law 19-86, § 2(c), 58 DCR 11186

History

1981 Ed., § 15-387.

Prior Codifications

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 2 of the Uniform Foreign Money-Judgments Recognition Act.

Editor's Notes